Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 7. Sport Fishing Facility Revenue Bonds.

Editor’s notes. —

Sections 34 and 35,
ch. 18, SLA 2016, provide that
AS

37.15.765

—

37.15.799

are repealed “only if the commissioner of fish and game notifies the revisor of statutes in writing … of the date that the principal amount of the bonds issued under
AS

37.15.765

—

37.15.799

, together with the interest on them and any interest owing on unpaid installments of interest, and all other obligations with respect to the bonds, have been fully met and discharged.” Under sec. 36,
ch. 18, SLA 2016, the repeal takes effect on “January 1 of the calendar year of notice under sec. 35 of this Act.” The notice to the revisor of statutes was made on September 3, 2020, and the effective date of the repeal of
AS 37.15.765 —
37.15.799 is January 1, 2021.

Sec. 37.15.765.
Bond authorization.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.770.
Bond redemption fund established.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.773.
Bond terms.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.777.
Bond resolution.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.780.
Pledge of the state.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.783.
Amounts required for payments.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.787.
Purposes and sufficiency of revenue.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.790.
Refunding.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.793.
Bonds as legal investments.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 37.15.799.
Definitions.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 18 SLA 2016.]